Utah statutes.
17-22-15.   Neglect or refusal to pay over money -- Penalty.

If he neglects or refuses to pay over on demand to the person entitled thereto any money which may come into his hands by virtue of his office, after deducting all legal fees, the amount thereof with 25% damages and interest at the rate of 1% per month from the time of demand may be recovered by such person; provided, that such sheriff may pay such money into the court or to the clerk thereof issuing the writ or process upon which such money is collected or received and from the time of such payment the sheriff shall be relieved of all liability therefor, unless the detention is shown to have been wrongful.



No Change Since 1953

